Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-196.01
Violations; cease and desist order; enforcement of act.

(1) Whenever the director has reason to believe that any person has violated any provision of the Weights and Measures Act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act, a hearing notice may be issued requiring the person to appear before the director to show cause why an order should not be entered requiring such person to cease and desist from the violation charged. Such hearing notice shall set forth the alleged violation, fix the time and place of the hearing, and specify the action to be considered at such hearing. Hearings shall be conducted as provided for in section 89-187.08. After a hearing, if the director finds such person to be in violation, he or she may enter an order requiring the person to cease and desist from the specific act, practice, or omission.

(2) The director may apply to the county attorney of the county in which the violation occurred or the Attorney General's office to take appropriate action pursuant to sections 89-198 and 89-1,101 without first entering an order as set forth in subsection (1) of this section when there exists an endangerment to the public health, safety, or welfare.

Laws 1991, LB 356, § 26;

Laws 1999, LB 473, § 10.